Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201885-2422
Guaranty Recovery Cash Fund; established; use; investment.

The Guaranty Recovery Cash Fund is hereby established. The fund shall receive assessments imposed by the commission pursuant to section 85-2423 and shall be used by the commission to pay claims authorized pursuant to section 85-2426. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest earned on the money in the fund shall accrue to the fund.

Laws 2017, LB512, § 31.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.